lexd_components/hyw-nouns_lex_suffixbased.lexd
#List of all words that take the ութիւն suffix
#The suffix utjun cannot be part of the stem
LEXICON NounUtjunSuffix
առաջնորդութիւն:առաջնորդու
արիութիւն:արիու
արիւնահեղութիւն:արիւնահեղու
բծաւորութիւն:բծաւորու
զանցառութիւն:զանցառու
ընդդիմութիւն:ընդդիմու
խառնակութիւն:խառնակու
կակղութիւն:կակղու
կայունութիւն:կայունու
կարկամութիւն:կարկամու
համագործութիւն:համագործու
հարստութիւն:հարստու
հրարկութիւն:հրարկու
տնաշինութիւն:տնաշինու
գիշերայածութիւն:գիշերայածու
երկխմբութիւն:երկխմբու
միախմբութիւն:միախմբու
տարապայմանողութիւն:տարապայմանողու
փոխյարաբերութիւն:փոխյարաբերու
փոխնախագահութիւն:փոխնախագահու
պաճարաբուծութիւն:պաճարաբուծու
մելամաղձութիւն:մելամաղձու
մեծամոլութիւն:մեծամոլու
մեծասրտութիւն:մեծասրտու
յաճախութիւն:յաճախու
յառաջդիմութիւն:յառաջդիմու
նշանաբանութիւն:նշանաբանու
պարկեշտաբանութիւն:պարկեշտաբանու
ջրախուսութիւն:ջրախուսու
ռատիոգիտութիւն:ռատիոգիտու
վատախառնութիւն:վատախառնու
տարագրութիւն:տարագրու
տարաձայնութիւն:տարաձայնու
տեսութիւն:տեսու
տժգունութիւն:տժգունու
ցուցականութիւն:ցուցականու
փոխադրութիւն:փոխադրու
քաղաքապետութիւն:քաղաքապետու
օրագրութիւն:օրագրու
աբբայութիւն:աբբայու
աբեղայութիւն:աբեղայու
ագահութիւն:ագահու
ագարակաբանութիւն:ագարակաբանու
ագարակագիտութիւն:ագարակագիտու
ազատագրութիւն:ազատագրու
ազատածնութիւն:ազատածնու
ազատականութիւն:ազատականու
ազատատոհմութիւն:ազատատոհմու
ազատութիւն:ազատու
ազգաբանութիւն:ազգաբանու
ազգագրութիւն:ազգագրու
ազգախառնութիւն:ազգախառնու
ազգախօսութիւն:ազգախօսու
ազգականութիւն:ազգականու
ազգակցութիւն:ազգակցու
ազգահամարութիւն:ազգահամարու
ազգահանութիւն:ազգահանու
ազգահատութիւն:ազգահատու
ազգայնականութիւն:ազգայնականու
ազգայնամոլութիւն:ազգայնամոլու
ազգայնութիւն:ազգայնու
ազգապետութիւն:ազգապետու
ազգապղծութիւն:ազգապղծու
ազգասիրութիւն:ազգասիրու
ազգատոհմակցութիւն:ազգատոհմակցու
ազգաւորութիւն:ազգաւորու
ազգութիւն:ազգու
ազդարարութիւն:ազդարարու
ազդեցութիւն:ազդեցու
ազդողութիւն:ազդողու
ազնուազգութիւն:ազնուազգու
ազնուականութիւն:ազնուականու
ազնուապետութիւն:ազնուապետու
ազնուատոհմութիւն:ազնուատոհմու
ազնուութիւն:ազնուու
աթաբէկութիւն:աթաբէկու
աթոռակալութիւն:աթոռակալու
աժանութիւն:աժանու
ալեկոծութիւն:ալեկոծու
ալեւորութիւն:ալեւորու
ալիւրադիւթութիւն:ալիւրադիւթու
ալքոլականութիւն:ալքոլականու
ախոնդանոտութիւն:ախոնդանոտու
ախոնդացաւութիւն:ախոնդացաւու
ախոռապահութիւն:ախոռապահու
ախտաբանութիւն:ախտաբանու
ախտաբուժութիւն:ախտաբուժու
ախտագուշակութիւն:ախտագուշակու
ախտազերծութիւն:ախտազերծու
ախտաժէտութիւն:ախտաժէտու
ախտածնութիւն:ախտածնու
ախտակրութիւն:ախտակրու
ախտաճանաչութիւն:ախտաճանաչու
ախտամոլութիւն:ախտամոլու
ախտասիրութիւն:ախտասիրու
ախտաւորութիւն:ախտաւորու
ածխահանութիւն:ածխահանու
ածխահարութիւն:ածխահարու
ածխավաճառութիւն:ածխավաճառու
ականատեսութիւն:ականատեսու
ականջաբանութիւն:ականջաբանու
ականջագրութիւն:ականջագրու
ականջադրութիւն:ականջադրու
ակնագործութիւն:ակնագործու
ակնածութիւն:ակնածու
ակնառութիւն:ակնառու
ակնավաճառութիւն:ակնավաճառու
ակնարկութիւն:ակնարկու
ակներեւութիւն:ակներեւու
ակնկալութիւն:ակնկալու
ակնկորութիւն:ակնկորու
ակնհատութիւն:ակնհատու
ահաբեկութիւն:ահաբեկու
ահագնութիւն:ահագնու
ահարկութիւն:ահարկու
ահաւորութիւն:ահաւորու
ահռելիութիւն:ահռելիու
աղաբանութիւն:աղաբանու
աղագործութիւն:աղագործու
աղագրութիւն:աղագրու
աղահմայութիւն:աղահմայու
աղամարութիւն:աղամարու
աղանդաւորութիւն:աղանդաւորու
աղավաճառութիւն:աղավաճառու
աղարտութիւն:աղարտու
աղաւաղութիւն:աղաւաղու
աղբակերութիւն:աղբակերու
աղեբանութիւն:աղեբանու
աղեգրութիւն:աղեգրու
աղեդարձութիւն:աղեդարձու
աղեթափութիւն:աղեթափու
աղեխցութիւն:աղեխցու
աղեհատութիւն:աղեհատու
աղերսաբանութիւն:աղերսաբանու
աղերսագրութիւն:աղերսագրու
աղեցաւութիւն:աղեցաւու
աղէթափութիւն:աղէթափու
աղէխցութիւն:աղէխցու
աղէկութիւն:աղէկու
աղիկամութիւն:աղիկամու
աղիւսագործութիւն:աղիւսագործու
աղծապղծութիւն:աղծապղծու
աղճատաբանութիւն:աղճատաբանու
աղութիւն:աղու
աղուորութիւն:աղուորու
աղտեղութիւն:աղտեղու
աղցաւորութիւն:աղցաւորու
աղքատասիրութիւն:աղքատասիրու
աղքատութիւն:աղքատու
աղօթասիրութիւն:աղօթասիրու
աղօտութիւն:աղօտու
աղօրեպանութիւն:աղօրեպանու
աճառաբանութիւն:աճառաբանու
աճառահատութիւն:աճառահատու
աճպարարութիւն:աճպարարու
ամայութիւն:ամայու
ամբաստանութիւն:ամբաստանու
ամբարհաւաճութիւն:ամբարհաւաճու
ամբարշտութիւն:ամբարշտու
ամբարտաւանութիւն:ամբարտաւանու
ամբոխավարութիւն:ամբոխավարու
ամբոխութիւն:ամբոխու
ամբողջութիւն:ամբողջու
ամեհութիւն:ամեհու
ամենագիտութիւն:ամենագիտու
ամենագրութիւն:ամենագրու
ամենազօրութիւն:ամենազօրու
ամենակալութիւն:ամենակալու
ամենակարողութիւն:ամենակարողու
ամենաստուածութիւն:ամենաստուածու
ամենուրեքութիւն:ամենուրեքու
ամիրապետութիւն:ամիրապետու
ամլութիւն:ամլու
ամուսնաբանութիւն:ամուսնաբանու
ամուսնաթողութիւն:ամուսնաթողու
ամուսնութիւն:ամուսնու
ամուրիութիւն:ամուրիու
ամպաբանութիւն:ամպաբանու
ամպահարութիւն:ամպահարու
ամպարշտութիւն:ամպարշտու
ամսաբանութիւն:ամսաբանու
ամրագործութիւն:ամրագործու
ամրութիւն:ամրու
ամփոփութիւն:ամփոփու
այգեգործութիւն:այգեգործու
այգեմշակութիւն:այգեմշակու
այժմէութիւն:այժմէու
այլաբանութիւն:այլաբանու
այլաբուժութիւն:այլաբուժու
այլագունութիւն:այլագունու
այլագրութիւն:այլագրու
այլադասութիւն:այլադասու
այլադարձութիւն:այլադարձու
այլադաւանութիւն:այլադաւանու
այլադրութիւն:այլադրու
այլազանութիւն:այլազանու
այլազգութիւն:այլազգու
այլազրկութիւն:այլազրկու
այլակազմութիւն:այլակազմու
այլակարգութիւն:այլակարգու
այլակերպութիւն:այլակերպու
այլակութիւն:այլակու
այլահաւատութիւն:այլահաւատու
այլաձայնութիւն:այլաձայնու
այլայլութիւն:այլայլու
այլանդակութիւն:այլանդակու
այլաշարժութիւն:այլաշարժու
այլաչափութիւն:այլաչափու
այլառիչութիւն:այլառիչու
այլասացութիւն:այլասացու
այլասեռութիւն:այլասեռու
այլասիրութիւն:այլասիրու
այլատեղութիւն:այլատեղու
այլատեսութիւն:այլատեսու
այլափառութիւն:այլափառու
այլափոխութիւն:այլափոխու
այլուրկայութիւն:այլուրկայու
այլուրութիւն:այլուրու
այխախորշութիւն:այխախորշու
այսաբանութիւն:այսաբանու
այսահանութիւն:այսահանու
այտակազմութիւն:այտակազմու
այտուցաբանութիւն:այտուցաբանու
այրասիրութիւն:այրասիրու
այրասպանութիւն:այրասպանու
այրեցականութիւն:այրեցականու
այրեցողութիւն:այրեցողու
այրիութիւն:այրիու
այրութիւն:այրու
այցարարութիւն:այցարարու
այցելութիւն:այցելու
անագանութիւն:անագանու
անագանուսումնութիւն:անագանուսումնու
անագորունութիւն:անագորունու
անազատութիւն:անազատու
անազնուականութիւն:անազնուականու
անազնուութիւն:անազնուու
անախորժութիւն:անախորժու
անախտութիւն:անախտու
անակնածութիւն:անակնածու
անաճելիութիւն:անաճելիու
անամուսնութիւն:անամուսնու
անամօթութիւն:անամօթու
անայլայլականութիւն:անայլայլականու
անանձնաւորութիւն:անանձնաւորու
անաչառութիւն:անաչառու
անապականութիւն:անապականու
անապաշաւութիւն:անապաշաւու
անապաշխարութիւն:անապաշխարու
անառակութիւն:անառակու
անառաւելութիւն:անառաւելու
անառիկութիւն:անառիկու
անառողջութիւն:անառողջու
անասնաբուժութիւն:անասնաբուժու
անասնաբուծութիւն:անասնաբուծու
անասնագիտութիւն:անասնագիտու
անասնագողութիւն:անասնագողու
անասնագրութիւն:անասնագրու
անասնազննութիւն:անասնազննու
անասնազոհութիւն:անասնազոհու
անասնախտութիւն:անասնախտու
անասնահատութիւն:անասնահատու
անասնամոլութիւն:անասնամոլու
անասնապաշտութիւն:անասնապաշտու
անասնութիւն:անասնու
անաստուածութիւն:անաստուածու
անատակութիւն:անատակու
անարատութիւն:անարատու
անարբունութիւն:անարբունու
անարգասաւորութիւն:անարգասաւորու
անարգելութիւն:անարգելու
անարգութիւն:անարգու
անարդարութիւն:անարդարու
անարդիւնաբերութիւն:անարդիւնաբերու
անարդութիւն:անարդու
անարժանութիւն:անարժանու
անարիութիւն:անարիու
անարիւնութիւն:անարիւնու
անարծաթասիրութիւն:անարծաթասիրու
անարուեստութիւն:անարուեստու
անաւագութիւն:անաւագու
անբաժանականութիւն:անբաժանականու
անբաժանութիւն:անբաժանու
անբախտութիւն:անբախտու
անբաղդութիւն:անբաղդու
անբանութիւն:անբանու
անբարեխառնութիւն:անբարեխառնու
անբարեպաշտութիւն:անբարեպաշտու
անբարոյականութիւն:անբարոյականու
անբարութիւն:անբարու
անբաւականութիւն:անբաւականու
անբաւութիւն:անբաւու
անբերութիւն:անբերու
անբերրութիւն:անբերրու
անբժշկելիութիւն:անբժշկելիու
անբժշկութիւն:անբժշկու
անբծութիւն:անբծու
անբնակութիւն:անբնակու
անբուժելիութիւն:անբուժելիու
անբռնաբարութիւն:անբռնաբարու
անգաղտնապահութիւն:անգաղտնապահու
անգայտութիւն:անգայտու
անգեղեցկութիւն:անգեղեցկու
անգթութիւն:անգթու
անգիտակցութիւն:անգիտակցու
անգիտութիւն:անգիտու
անգլիականութիւն:անգլիականու
անգլիատեացութիւն:անգլիատեացու
անգլխութիւն:անգլխու
անգղիաբանութիւն:անգղիաբանու
անգղիամոլութիւն:անգղիամոլու
անգոյութիւն:անգոյու
անգոսնութիւն:անգոսնու
անգործադրութիւն:անգործադրու
անգործածութիւն:անգործածու
անգործութիւն:անգործու
անգործունէութիւն:անգործունէու
անգորովութիւն:անգորովու
անգրութիւն:անգրու
անդամազննութիւն:անդամազննու
անդամալուծութիւն:անդամալուծու
անդամախեղութիւն:անդամախեղու
անդամակցութիւն:անդամակցու
անդամահատութիւն:անդամահատու
անդամատութիւն:անդամատու
անդանդաղութիւն:անդանդաղու
անդաչափութիւն:անդաչափու
անդասութիւն:անդասու
անդարձութիւն:անդարձու
անդէորդութիւն:անդէորդու
անդորրութիւն:անդորրու
անդուլութիւն:անդուլու
անդրադարձութիւն:անդրադարձու
անդրալեռնականութիւն:անդրալեռնականու
անդրանկութիւն:անդրանկու
անդրապատմութիւն:անդրապատմու
անդրաստորոգութիւն:անդրաստորոգու
անդրատառութիւն:անդրատառու
անդրդուութիւն:անդրդուու
անդրժականութիւն:անդրժականու
անդրժելիութիւն:անդրժելիու
անդրիագործութիւն:անդրիագործու
անդրիանդագործութիւն:անդրիանդագործու
անդրլեռնականութիւն:անդրլեռնականու
անեղծութիւն:անեղծու
անեռանդութիւն:անեռանդու
անեռացականութիւն:անեռացականու
աներանգութիւն:աներանգու
աներեսութիւն:աներեսու
աներեւութիւն:աներեւու
աներեւութութիւն:աներեւութու
աներկբայութիւն:աներկբայու
աներկեւանութիւն:աներկեւանու
աներկիւղութիւն:աներկիւղու
անզանազանութիւն:անզանազանու
անզարդարութիւն:անզարդարու
անզարկութիւն:անզարկու
անզաւակութիւն:անզաւակու
անզբաղութիւն:անզբաղու
անզգամութիւն:անզգամու
անզգայութիւն:անզգայու
անզգաստութիւն:անզգաստու
անզգուշութիւն:անզգուշու
անզղջութիւն:անզղջու
անզուգութիւն:անզուգու
անզօրաբանութիւն:անզօրաբանու
անզօրութիւն:անզօրու
անէութիւն:անէու
անըմբռնողութիւն:անըմբռնողու
անընդունակութիւն:անընդունակու
անընդունելիութիւն:անընդունելիու
անընդունելութիւն:անընդունելու
անընկերականութիւն:անընկերականու
անընչեղութիւն:անընչեղու
անընչութիւն:անընչու
անընտելութիւն:անընտելու
անընտրողութիւն:անընտրողու
անթափանցականութիւն:անթափանցականու
անթափանցելիութիւն:անթափանցելիու
անթիպատութիւն:անթիպատու
անթլփատութիւն:անթլփատու
անժամանութիւն:անժամանու
անժառանգութիւն:անժառանգու
անժողովրդականութիւն:անժողովրդականու
անժուժկալութիւն:անժուժկալու
անժուժութիւն:անժուժու
անիծաբանութիւն:անիծաբանու
անիմայութիւն:անիմայու
անինքնաբացութիւն:անինքնաբացու
անիշխանութիւն:անիշխանու
անիրագործութիւն:անիրագործու
անիրաւութիւն:անիրաւու
անլուծականութիւն:անլուծականու
անլուծելիութիւն:անլուծելիու
անլսելիութիւն:անլսելիու
անլսողութիւն:անլսողու
անխախտականութիւն:անխախտականու
անխայութիւն:անխայու
անխելութիւն:անխելու
անխելքութիւն:անխելքու
անխղճութիւն:անխղճու
անխոհեմութիւն:անխոհեմու
անխոնջութիւն:անխոնջու
անխորհրդածութիւն:անխորհրդածու
անխորհրդապահութիւն:անխորհրդապահու
անխռովութիւն:անխռովու
անխտրականութիւն:անխտրականու
անխտրութիւն:անխտրու
անխրատութիւն:անխրատու
անխօսութիւն:անխօսու
անծանօթութիւն:անծանօթու
անծարաւութիւն:անծարաւու
անծիածանութիւն:անծիածանու
անծննդականութիւն:անծննդականու
անծննդութիւն:անծննդու
անկազմակերպութիւն:անկազմակերպու
անկազմութիւն:անկազմու
անկաթնութիւն:անկաթնու
անկախութիւն:անկախու
անկածութիւն:անկածու
անկամութիւն:անկամու
անկայութիւն:անկայու
անկանոնութիւն:անկանոնու
անկաշառութիւն:անկաշառու
անկապակցութիւն:անկապակցու
անկապաշտութիւն:անկապաշտու
անկասկածութիւն:անկասկածու
անկատարելիութիւն:անկատարելիու
անկատարելութիւն:անկատարելու
անկատարութիւն:անկատարու
անկարգութիւն:անկարգու
անկարելիութիւն:անկարելիու
անկարողութիւն:անկարողու
անկարութիւն:անկարու
անկարօտութիւն:անկարօտու
անկեղծաւորութիւն:անկեղծաւորու
անկեղծութիւն:անկեղծու
անկենդանութիւն:անկենդանու
անկերակրութիւն:անկերակրու
անկիզութիւն:անկիզու
անկիւնաչափութիւն:անկիւնաչափու
անկլիկանութիւն:անկլիկանու
անկշռականութիւն:անկշռականու
անկողմնակալութիւն:անկողմնակալու
անկողնակցութիւն:անկողնակցու
անկորստականութիւն:անկորստականու
անկրթութիւն:անկրթու
անկրօնութիւն:անկրօնու
անկցորդութիւն:անկցորդու
անհալութիւն:անհալու
անհաճոյութիւն:անհաճոյու
անհամակեդրոնութիւն:անհամակեդրոնու
անհամակերպութիւն:անհամակերպու
անհամաձայնութիւն:անհամաձայնու
անհամաձեւութիւն:անհամաձեւու
անհամաչափութիւն:անհամաչափու
անհամբերութիւն:անհամբերու
անհամեմատութիւն:անհամեմատու
անհամեստութիւն:անհամեստու
անհամութիւն:անհամու
անհանգիտութիւն:անհանգիտու
անհանգունութիւն:անհանգունու
անհանգստութիւն:անհանգստու
անհանդարտութիւն:անհանդարտու
անհանճարութիւն:անհանճարու
անհաշուելիութիւն:անհաշուելիու
անհաշտութիւն:անհաշտու
անհասականութիւն:անհասականու
անհասկացողութիւն:անհասկացողու
անհասութիւն:անհասու
անհաստատութիւն:անհաստատու
անհատականութիւն:անհատականու
անհատութիւն:անհատու
անհարազատութիւն:անհարազատու
անհարթութիւն:անհարթու
անհաւանականութիւն:անհաւանականու
անհաւանութիւն:անհաւանու
անհաւասարութիւն:անհաւասարու
